Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.300.478

Social-emotional learning standards and benchmarks.

(1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall review the recommendations of the social-emotional learning work group convened as directed in the 2017 omnibus appropriations act and the recommendations of the social-emotional learning committee created in RCW 28A.300.477. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall adopt social-emotional learning standards and benchmarks by January 1, 2020, and revise the social-emotional learning standards and benchmarks as appropriate.

(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall align the programs it oversees with the standards for social-emotional learning and integrate the standards where appropriate.

[ 2019 c 386 s 2.]